North Carolina statutes. Chapter 54. Cooperative Organizations.
Article 14D. Membership.

§ 54-109.26.
“Membership” defined.

The membership of a credit union shall be limited to and consist of the subscribers to the articles of incorporation and such other persons within the common bond set forth in the bylaws as have been duly admitted members, have paid any required entrance fee or membership fee, or both, have subscribed for one or more shares, and have paid the initial installment thereon, and have complied with such other requirements as the articles of incorporation or bylaws specify.

Credit union membership may include groups having a common bond of similar occupation, association or interest, or groups who reside within an identifiable neighborhood, community, or rural district, or employees of a common employer, and members of the immediate family of such persons.

History.

1915, c. 115, s. 6; C.S., s. 5230; 1925, c. 73, s. 3; 1935, c. 87; 1965, c. 956, s. 18; 1975, c. 538, s. 1.

§ 54-109.27.
Societies and other associations.

Societies, and copartnerships composed primarily of individuals who are eligible to membership, and corporations whose stockholders are composed primarily of such individuals, may be admitted to membership in the same manner and under the same conditions as individuals, but may not borrow in excess of their shareholdings. Provided, however, secured loans in excess of shareholdings may be made to nonprofit societies, copartnerships, and corporations who are members.

History.

1975, c. 538, s. 1; 1979, c. 809, s. 1.

§ 54-109.28.
Other credit unions.

Any credit union organized under Articles 14A to 14L of this Chapter may permit membership of any other credit union organized under Articles 14A to 14L of this Chapter or other acts.

History.

1975, c. 538, s. 1.

§ 54-109.29.
Members who leave field.

Members who leave the field of membership may be permitted to retain their membership in the credit union as a matter of general policy of the board of directors.

History.

1975, c. 538, s. 1.

§ 54-109.30.
Liability of shareholders.

A shareholder of any such corporation, unless the bylaws so provide, shall not be individually liable for the payment of its debts for an amount in excess of the par value of the shares which he owns or for which he has subscribed.

History.

1975, c. 538, s. 1.

§ 54-109.31.
Meetings of members.

The annual meeting and any special meetings of the members of the credit union shall be held at the time, place, and in the manner indicated by the bylaws.

At all such meetings, a member shall have but one vote, irrespective of his shareholdings. No member may vote by proxy, but a member may vote by absentee ballot if the bylaws of the credit union so provide.

A society, association, copartnership or corporation having membership in the credit union may be represented and have its vote cast by one of its members or shareholders, provided such person has been fully authorized by the organization’s governing body.

The board of directors may establish a minimum age of 16 years of age as a qualification to vote at meetings of the members.

The board of directors may establish a minimum age of 18 years of age as a qualification to hold office.

History.

1975, c. 538, s. 1.

§§ 54-109.32 through 54-109.34.

Reserved for future codification purposes.